viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX wO Y 49
SFX wO aindre aindre/ aindre  is:infi
SFX wO aindre aignant/ aindre  is:ppre
SFX wO aindre aint/ aindre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX wO aindre aints/ aindre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX wO aindre ainte/ aindre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX wO aindre aint·e/ aindre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX wO aindre aintes/ aindre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX wO aindre aint·es/ aindre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX wO aindre ains/ aindre  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX wO aindre aint/ aindre  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignons/ aindre  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignez/ aindre  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignent/ aindre  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX wO aindre aignais/ aindre  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignait/ aindre  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignions/ aindre  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX wO aindre aigniez/ aindre  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignaient/ aindre  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX wO aindre aignis/ aindre  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignit/ aindre  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignîmes/ aindre  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignîtes/ aindre  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignirent/ aindre  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX wO aindre aindrai/ aindre  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX wO aindre aindras/ aindre  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX wO aindre aindra/ aindre  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX wO aindre aindrons/ aindre  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX wO aindre aindrez/ aindre  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX wO aindre aindront/ aindre  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX wO aindre aindrais/ aindre  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX wO aindre aindrait/ aindre  is:cond is:3sg
SFX wO aindre aindrions/ aindre  is:cond is:1pl
SFX wO aindre aindriez/ aindre  is:cond is:2pl
SFX wO aindre aindraient/ aindre  is:cond is:3pl
SFX wO aindre aigne/ aindre  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignes/ aindre  is:spre is:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignisse/ aindre  is:simp is:1sg
SFX wO aindre aignisses/ aindre  is:simp is:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignît/ aindre  is:simp is:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignissions/ aindre  is:simp is:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignissiez/ aindre  is:simp is:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignissent/ aindre  is:simp is:3pl
SFX wO aindre ains/ aindre  is:impe is:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignons/ aindre  is:impe is:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignez/ aindre  is:impe is:2pl
SFX wO aindre aint-e/ aindre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX wO aindre aint-es/ aindre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX wO aindre aint·e·s/ aindre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX wO aindre aint-e-s/ aindre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX wP Y 49
SFX wP aincre aincre/ vaincre  is:infi
SFX wP aincre ainquant/ vaincre  is:ppre
SFX wP aincre aincu/ vaincre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX wP aincre aincus/ vaincre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX wP aincre aincue/ vaincre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX wP aincre aincu·e/ vaincre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX wP aincre aincues/ vaincre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX wP aincre aincu·es/ vaincre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX wP aincre aincs/ vaincre  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainc/ vaincre  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquons/ vaincre  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquez/ vaincre  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquent/ vaincre  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX wP aincre ainquais/ vaincre  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquait/ vaincre  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquions/ vaincre  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquiez/ vaincre  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquaient/ vaincre  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX wP aincre ainquis/ vaincre  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquit/ vaincre  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquîmes/ vaincre  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquîtes/ vaincre  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquirent/ vaincre  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX wP aincre aincrai/ vaincre  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX wP aincre aincras/ vaincre  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX wP aincre aincra/ vaincre  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX wP aincre aincrons/ vaincre  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX wP aincre aincrez/ vaincre  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX wP aincre aincront/ vaincre  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX wP aincre aincrais/ vaincre  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX wP aincre aincrait/ vaincre  is:cond is:3sg
SFX wP aincre aincrions/ vaincre  is:cond is:1pl
SFX wP aincre aincriez/ vaincre  is:cond is:2pl
SFX wP aincre aincraient/ vaincre  is:cond is:3pl
SFX wP aincre ainque/ vaincre  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainques/ vaincre  is:spre is:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquisse/ vaincre  is:simp is:1sg
SFX wP aincre ainquisses/ vaincre  is:simp is:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquît/ vaincre  is:simp is:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquissions/ vaincre  is:simp is:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquissiez/ vaincre  is:simp is:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquissent/ vaincre  is:simp is:3pl
SFX wP aincre aincs/ vaincre  is:impe is:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquons/ vaincre  is:impe is:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquez/ vaincre  is:impe is:2pl
SFX wP aincre aincu-e/ vaincre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX wP aincre aincu-es/ vaincre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX wP aincre aincu·e·s/ vaincre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX wP aincre aincu-e-s/ vaincre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
